fst_model.xfst
define V [a | e | ı | i | o | ö | u | ü];

read lexc lexicon.lexc
define Lexicon

define Rule1 t->d, p->b, ç->c, k->ğ || _"^".#.;
define Rule2 "^" -> V || _.#.;
define Rule3 	V -> [a | ı] || [a | ı] ? _ .#. ,,
				V -> [e | i] || [e | i] ? _ .#. ,,
				V -> [u | a] || [o | u] ? _ .#. ,,
				V -> [ü | e] || [ö | ü] ? _ .#.;

regex Lexicon .o. Rule1 .o. Rule2 .o. Rule3;

save stack 151044018.fst
